Tennessee, session 114, HB0091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The Tennessee department of education shall, no later than January 1,
2026, submit a request to the United States department of education to amend this state's
Every Student Succeeds Act (ESSA) plan to remove all end-of-course assessment
requirements for students in grades nine through twelve (9-12) and to allow the ACT, SAT, or
another postsecondary readiness assessment approved by the commissioner of education for
purposes of Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-6001(b), to be annually administered to
students in grades nine through twelve (9-12) and for student performance on such
assessments to be used for student, school, and district accountability purposes.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0091
001112
- 1 -